test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-pallw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - pallõ: # Verb 16 'eng /est paluda/fin' - full paradigm
     pallõ+V+Inf: pallõ
     pallõ+V+Ger: pallõs
     pallõ+V+Ger: pallõs
     pallõ+V+Sup: pǭlam
     pallõ+V+Sup+Ine: pǭlamõs
     pallõ+V+Sup+Ela: pǭlamõst
     pallõ+V+Sup+Tra: pǭlamõks
     pallõ+V+Sup+Abe: pǭlamõt
     pallõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pǭlab
     pallõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pǭlat
     pallõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pǭlabõd
     pallõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pǭliz
     pallõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [pǭlizt, pǭliztõ]
     pallõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [pǭlizt, pǭliztõ]
     pallõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: pal
     pallõ+V+Cond+Sg3: pǭlaks
     pallõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: pǭla
     pallõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: pallõ
     pallõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: pǭlagid
     pallõ+V+Jus+Sg3: pǭlag
     pallõ+V+QuoSg3: pǭlaji
     pallõ+V+ActPrfPrc: pallõn
     pallõ+V+PssPrfPrc: paldõd
